Maine, session 132, LD1158.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1616, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. Except as provided in subsection 2, beginning January 1, 2027, a person may not
sell or offer for sale in the State any of the following appliances and products
manufactured on or after January 1, 2027 that are prohibited from sale in rules adopted
by the department in accordance with subsection 3:
(1) Commercial battery chargers;
(2) Commercial dishwashers;
(3) Commercial food steamers;
(4) Commercial fryers;
(5) Commercial ovens;
(6) Computer server power supplies; and
(7) Residential ventilating fans.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §1616, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 433, §1 and
reallocated by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §135, is amended to read:
B. In determining a person's compliance with paragraph paragraphs A and A-1, the
department shall, to the greatest extent practicable and where consistent with the
requirements of this subsection, use information available from other states that
regulate the same appliances and products.
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §1616, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 433, §1 and
reallocated by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §135, is amended to read:
C. A person who violates paragraph A or A-1 commits a civil violation for which a
fine of not more than $100 may be adjudged.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §1616, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 433, §1 and reallocated
by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §135, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
Page 1 - 132LR0892(03)

2. Exclusions; federal preemption. This section does not apply to any appliances
and products:
A. Listed in subsection 1, paragraph A, subparagraphs (1) to (8) that are manufactured
before January 1, 2023;
B. Listed in subsection 1, paragraph A-1, subparagraphs (1) to (7) that are
manufactured before January 1, 2027; or
C. Listed in subsection 1, paragraph A or A-1 that are sold or offered for sale in the
State in used condition.
An appliance or product listed in subsection 1, paragraph A or A-1 is exempt from the
prohibitions in this section and the rules adopted pursuant to this section if state regulation
of the appliance or product is preempted by federal statute or regulation, for as long as that
federal preemption remains in effect.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §1616, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 433, §1 and reallocated
by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §135, is amended to read:
3. Rules. The department may adopt rules to prohibit the sale or offering for sale in
the State of appliances or products described in subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs A and
A-1. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Page 2 - 132LR0892(03)